Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-594
Agency or political subdivision of state; limitation on power.

(1) Except as provided in the Educational Service Units Act and sections 79-1319, 81-1120.01 to 81-1120.28, 85-401 to 85-418, 85-1501 to 85-1542, and 86-575, an agency or political subdivision of the state that is not a public power supplier shall not provide on a retail or wholesale basis any broadband services, Internet services, telecommunications services, or video services.

(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to services which an agency or political subdivision of the state was authorized to provide and was providing prior to January 1, 2005.

Laws 2005, LB 645, § 2.

Educational Service Units Act, see section 79-1201.